Utah statutes.
53-10-404.5.   Obtaining DNA specimen at time of booking -- Payment of fee upon conviction.

(1) (a)  When a sheriff books a person for any offense under Subsection 53-10-403(1)(c), the sheriff shall obtain a DNA specimen from the person upon booking of the person at the county jail, except under Subsection (1)(b).

(b)  If at the time of booking the sheriff is able to obtain information from the bureau stating that the bureau has on file a DNA specimen for the person, the sheriff is not required to obtain an additional DNA specimen.

(2)  The person booked under Subsection (1) shall pay a fee of $150 for the cost of obtaining the DNA specimen if:

(a)  the charge upon which the booking is based is resolved by a conviction or the person is convicted of any charge arising out of the same criminal episode regarding which the DNA specimen was obtained; and

(b)  the person's DNA sample is not on file under Subsection (1)(b).

(3) (a)  All fees collected under Subsection (2) shall be deposited in the DNA Specimen Restricted Account created in Section 53-10-407, except that the agency collecting the fee may retain not more than $25 per individual specimen for the costs of obtaining the DNA specimen.

(b)  The agency collecting the $150 fee may not retain from each separate fee more than $25, and no amount of the $150 fee may be credited to any other fee or agency obligation.

(4)  Any DNA specimen obtained under this section shall be held and may not be processed until:

(a)  the court has bound the person over for trial following a preliminary hearing for any charge arising out of the same criminal episode regarding which the person was booked;

(b)  the person has waived the preliminary hearing for any charge arising out of the same criminal episode regarding which the person was booked; or

(c)  a grand jury has returned an indictment for any charge arising out of the same criminal episode regarding which the person was booked.



Enacted by Chapter 405, 2010 General Session

